Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 11
GEORGIA AGRIRAMA DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY

Cross references.

- Agriculture, T. 2.

12-3-650. Definitions.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 12/HB 142, effective May 13, 2011.

Editor's notes.

- This Code section was based on Code 1981,

§

12-3-650

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 894,

§

2.

12-3-651. Redesignated.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2011, p. 99,

§

12/HB 142,
effective May 13, 2011, redesignated former Code Section 12-3-651 as present Code Section 20-3-73.1.

12-3-652 through 12-3-661.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 12/HB 142, effective May 13, 2011.

Editor's notes.

- These Code sections were based on Code 1981,

§§

12-3-652

- 12-3-661, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 894,

§

2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415,

§

12; Ga. L. 2004, p. 690,

§

9.

12-3-662. Redesignated.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2011, p. 99,

§

12/HB 142, effective May 13, 2011, redesignated former Code Section 12-3-662 as present Code Section 20-3-73.2.